District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1604

Available remedies for collection of taxes and assessments.

[Repealed].

Feb. 18, 1929, 45 Stat. 1226, ch. 259, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 582, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 161(h)(1)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 59(e), 45 DCR 745
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(v)(2), 48 DCR 334

History

1981 Ed., § 47-1604.
1973 Ed., § 47-1304.

Prior Codifications

Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”

Editor's Notes